Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3804
Person owning or controlling property;
duty to manage colonies.

Each
person who owns or controls property within a county that has adopted a coordinated
program for the management of black-tailed prairie dogs under section 23-3803
shall effectively manage colonies present upon his, her, or its property to
prevent the expansion of colonies to adjacent property if the owner of the
adjacent property objects to such expansion.

Laws 2012, LB473, § 4.